Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 85.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-531
Nebraska Arts Council.

AGENCY NO. 69 — NEBRASKA ARTS COUNCIL

Program No. 326 - Promotion and Development of the Arts

FY2007-08FY2008-09GENERAL FUND608,750618,060CASH FUND10,00010,000FEDERAL FUND est.128,107128,444PROGRAM TOTAL746,857756,504SALARY LIMIT423,668434,088

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Nebraska Arts Council work with the office of the Chief Information Officer to review and analyze the information technology and communication requirements of the agency and to determine the most efficient and cost-effective methods to manage information and provide services to constituent groups.

Laws 2007, LB321, § 230;

Laws 2008, LB959, § 85;

Laws 2008, LB960, § 185.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB 959, section 85, with LB 960, section 185, to reflect all amendments.April 3, 2008